apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="গড়/__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিলাম</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pcnd" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="prft" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="fam" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ppst" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="imp" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="impers" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="imp" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="fam" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="prft" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="imp" />
            <s n="impers" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>লি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="imp" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে থাকব</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="plprft" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="impers" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ব</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিল</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="plprft" />
            <s n="impers" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="inf" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিলাম</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="plprft" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>লে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="imp" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>লে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="fam" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িস</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pres" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিলি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="cnt" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>লেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="pol" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ft" />
            <s n="smpl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="infml" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>া</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="ger" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তেন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="past" />
            <s n="hbtl" />
            <s n="p3" />

    <e lm="পড়">
      <i>পড়</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="খেল">
      <i>খেল</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ছুট">
      <i>ছুট</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাতিল কর">
      <i>বাতিল<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অর্জন কর">
      <i>অর্জন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অবলম্বন কর">
      <i>অবলম্বন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিবর্ধন কর">
      <i>বিবর্ধন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মূল্যায়ন কর">
      <i>মূল্যায়ন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যুক্ত কর">
      <i>যুক্ত<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সমর্থন কর">
      <i>সমর্থন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গণনা কর">
      <i>গণনা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রদক্ষিণ কর">
      <i>প্রদক্ষিণ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যোগাযোগ কর">
      <i>যোগাযোগ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কনফিগার কর">
      <i>কনফিগার<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিয়ন্ত্রণ কর">
      <i>নিয়ন্ত্রণ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গণনা কর">
      <i>গণনা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উৎসর্গ কর">
      <i>উৎসর্গ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অস্বীকার কর">
      <i>অস্বীকার<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নির্ধারণ কর">
      <i>নির্ধারণ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দান কর">
      <i>দান<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বলবৎ কর">
      <i>বলবৎ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অতিক্রম কর">
      <i>অতিক্রম<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আশা কর">
      <i>আশা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সুবিধাজনক কর">
      <i>সুবিধাজনক<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ফোকাস কর">
      <i>ফোকাস<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="লাভ কর">
      <i>লাভ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চয়তা প্রদান কর">
      <i>নিশ্চয়তা<b />প্রদান<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আশা কর">
      <i>আশা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অন্তর্ভুক্ত কর">
      <i>অন্তর্ভুক্ত<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ইনস্টল কর">
      <i>ইনস্টল<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আমন্ত্রণ কর">
      <i>আমন্ত্রণ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চালু কর">
      <i>চালু<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধ্যাহ্নভোজন কর">
      <i>মধ্যাহ্নভোজন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উল্লেখ কর">
      <i>উল্লেখ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="লক্ষ্য কর">
      <i>লক্ষ্য<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পরিকল্পনা কর">
      <i>পরিকল্পনা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘোষনা কর">
      <i>ঘোষনা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যক্ত কর">
      <i>প্রতিক্রিয়া<b />ব্যক্ত<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভরসা কর">
      <i>ভরসা<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পুনরুদ্ধার কর">
      <i>পুনরুদ্ধার<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিযুক্ত কর">
      <i>নিযুক্ত<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চুরি কর">
      <i>চুরি<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অতিক্রম কর">
      <i>অতিক্রম<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভ্রমণ কর">
      <i>ভ্রমণ<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ওজন কর">
      <i>ওজন<b />কর</i>
      <par n="গড়/__vblex" />
    </e>
